Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.940

Fire service training program—Grants and bequests.

The Washington state patrol may accept any and all donations, grants, bequests, and devises, conditional or otherwise, or money, property, service, or other things of value which may be received from the United States or any agency thereof, any governmental agency, any institution, person, firm, or corporation, public and private, to be held, used, or applied for the purposes of the fire service training program established in RCW 43.43.934.

[ 1995 c 369 s 19; 1986 c 266 s 59. Formerly RCW 43.63A.350.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—1995 c 369: See notes following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.